Florida, session 2026, SB1474.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 12 13 Section 1.âPresent subsection (6) of section 403.0855, 14 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (7), and a new 15 subsection (6) is added to that section, to read: 16 403.0855âBiosolids management.â 17 (6)âThe department may not issue or renew a permit for a 18 land application site which authorizes disposal or land 19 application of septage, as defined in rule 62-640.200(43), 20 Florida Administrative Code, as Class B biosolids if there is a 21 permitted wastewater treatment facility that accepts septage for 22 higher levels of treatment which is: 23 (a)âLess than 30 miles from a proposed Class B biosolids 24 land application site; 25 (b)âOwned or operated by the Federal Government or a 26 federal agency, a state government body or agency, or a 27 political subdivision of this state; and 28 (c)âNot defunct, used for other purposes, or out of 29 capacity. 30 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2027.